nursery/apertium-tuk-tur/apertium-tuk-tur.tur.lexc
LEXICON SUBST

# ; 
clit-cop ; 
%<advl%>: # ; 
%<attr%>: clit-cop ;  ! This is the attributive adjective use of -kI, TRmorph <ki>
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} # ;  ! This is the attributive adjective use of -kI, TRmorph <ki>
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} NINFL-COMMON ; ! This is the attribute adjective 0 derived into a noun, TRmorph <ki>
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{k%}i DAKI ; ! This makes an attributive phrase from a noun, TRmorph <loc><ki>
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r clit ; 
NINFL-COMMON  ; 



LEXICON N1

%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: # ; 
%<adj%>:%>l%{I%}%{k%} # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<loc%>:%'%>%{D%}%{A%}%{k%}i DAKI ; ! This makes an attributive phrase from a noun, TRmorph <loc><ki>

LEXICON NP-ACR

%<np%>%<acr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<acr%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 


LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<al%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>: NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' NINFL-COMMON  ;  ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ; 
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;  ! <adv> as <adj> function

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ;


LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: NINFL-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{bI%}nc%{I%} # ; ! This is <D_IncI> in TRmorph
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{bI%}nc%{I%} NINFL-COMMON ; ! This is <D_IncI> in TRmorph

LEXICON V-PERS-G1

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{k%} # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}m clit ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  clit ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  clit ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  clit ;
V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3 ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-OPT-G3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>y%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>l%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IMP-G4

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{A%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n #;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n%{I%}z #;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n #;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n%{I%}z #;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}nl%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON VINFL-COMMON

%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} # ;
%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger2%>:%>m%{A%}%{K%} # ;
%<ger2%>:%>m%{A%}%{K%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} # ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}ş # ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}ş NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}n # ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}n NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<impp%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}r%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<impp%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}r%{A%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;

%<prc1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p # ;
%<prc1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p clit-cop ;

%<gna1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p clit-cop ;

%<gna9%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} # ;
%<gna9%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} clit-cop ;

%<cont%>:%>%{bI%}yor V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<cont%>:%>%{bI%}yor clit-cop ; ! This should be renamed e.g. <cont><past> 
%<opt%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} V-PERS-OPT-G3 ;
%<past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<evid%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<imp%>: V-PERS-IMP-G4 ;
%<fut%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ; 
%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<pii%>:%>m%{A%}kt%{A%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<oblig%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ;

!! Enumerate the possibilities for verb combinations in Turkish (go go turmorph!)
!! Unmarked entries get -t for causative if they end in l, r, or a vowel, otherwise -DIr. 
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_AR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>t  VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;


!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}rt VINFL-COMMON ;
!

LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR

%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ; ! add to all!
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;

!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR
! art<iv><caus_ir><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_IR
! IRREG does not get causative (it's in the lexicon ?)
! gel<iv><caus_irreg>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR
! IRREG does not get causative (it's in the lexicon ?)
! ay<iv><caus_irreg><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;

LEXICON Nouns
spor:spor N1 ; ! "sport"
araba:araba N1 ; ! ""
bakteri:bakteri N1 ; ! ""
bilinç:bilinç N1 ; ! ""
cep:ce%{p%} N1 ; ! ""
değirmen:değirmen N1 ; ! ""
çene:çene N1 ; ! ""
teker:teker N1 ; ! ""
tuz:tuz N1 ; ! ""
yastık:yastı%{k%} N1 ; ! ""
evren:evren N1 ; ! ""
hız:hız N1 ; ! ""
kız% kardeş:kız% kardeş N1 ; ! ""
küme:küme N1 ; ! ""
sınav:sınav N1 ; ! ""
meyve:meyve N1 ; ! ""
özür:öz%{del%}ür N1 ; ! ""
dayanıklılık:dayanıklılık N1 ; ! "endurement"
mide:mide N1 ; ! "stomach"
LEXICON ProperNouns
Afrika:Afrika NP-TOP ; ! ""
Asya:Asya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Avustralya:Avustralya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Azerbaycan:Azerbaycan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Brezilya:Brezilya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Danimarka:Danimarka NP-TOP ; ! ""
Etiyopya:Etiyopya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Fransa:Fransa NP-TOP ; ! "France"
Hırvatistan:Hırvatistan NP-TOP ; ! "Croatia"
İspanya:İspanya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Japonya:Japonya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Kırgızistan:Kırgızistan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Libya:Libya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Macaristan:Macaristan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Rusya:Rusya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Türkiye:Türkiye NP-TOP ; ! ""
Amerika:Amerika NP-TOP ; ! "America"
Slovenya:Slovenya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ana:Ana NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ahmet:Ahmet NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Ana:Ana NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Anna:Anna NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ana:Ana NP-ANT-F ; ! "Ana"
Mary:Mary NP-ANT-F ; ! "Mary"
LEXICON Acronyms
AFP:AFP%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! AFP'nin
AP:AP%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "AP'nin"
BH:BH%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! BH'nin
BM:BM%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! BM'nin
CNA:CNA%{nın%} NP-ACR ; ! "CNA'nın"
DPMNE:DPMNE%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "DPMNE'nin"
EBRD:EBRD%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "EBRD'nin"
FT:FT%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "FT'nin"
HINA:HINA%{nın%} NP-ACR ; ! "HINA'nın"
KFOR:KFOR%{un%} NP-ACR ; ! "KFOR'un"
NTV:NTV%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "NTV'nin"
PIC:PIC%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "PIC'nin"
RTS:RTS%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "RTS'nin"
SDS:SDS%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "SDS'nin"
SRNA:SRNA%{nın%} NP-ACR ; ! "SRNA'nın"
TV:TV%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "TV'nin"
VMRO:VMRO%{nun%} NP-ACR ; ! "VMRO'nun"
LEXICON Adjectives 
var:var A2 ; ! ""
yok:yok A2 ; ! ""
sürekli:sürekli A1 ; ! ""
korkak:korka%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
düzgün:düzgün A1 ; ! ""
kibar:kibar A1 ; ! ""
saçma:saçma A1 ; ! ""
yapışık:yapışı%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
eğik:eğik A1 ; ! "skewed"
aksi:aksi A1 ; ! "agressive"
başarısız:başarısız A1 ; ! "unsuccessful"
dehşetli:dehşetli A1 ; ! "terrifying"
ergen:ergen A1 ; ! "adolescent"
gönüllü:gönüllü A1 ; ! "volunteer"
kapsamlı:kapsamlı A1 ; ! "comprehensive"
kutupsal:kutupsal A1 ; ! "polaral"
olumlu:olumlu A1 ; ! "positive, positive"
somurtkan:somurtkan A1 ; ! "surly"
yansız:yansız A1 ; ! "objective"
LEXICON Adverbs 
yeterince:yeterince ADV ; ! "enough, very"
çabukça:çabukça ADV ; ! "promptly"
bazen:bazen ADV ; ! ""
aşağı:aşağı ADV ; ! ""
belki:belki ADV ; ! ""
birdenbire:birdenbire ADV ; ! ""
böylece:böylece ADV ; ! ""
esasen:esasen ADV ; ! ""
haricen:haricen ADV ; ! ""
hiç:hiç ADV ; ! ""
nadiren:nadiren ADV ; ! ""
şimdi:şimdi ADV ; ! ""
tamamen:tamamen ADV ; ! ""
yine:yine ADV ; ! ""
hızlıca:hızlıca ADV ; ! "swiftly"
erkekçe:erkekçe ADV ; ! "manly"
kahramanca:kahramanca ADV ; ! "heroically"
LEXICON Verbs
ol:ol VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "be"
gel:gel VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_IR ; ! "come"
git:gi%{t%} VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR ; ! "go"
yak:yak VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "fire"
yat:yat VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "lie up"
evlen:evlen VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
gezin:gezin VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
konuş:konuş VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "talk"
koş:koş VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "run"
var:var VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "arrive"
yerleş:yerleş VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "settle"
bağır:bağır VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "shout"
bit:bi%{t%} VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "finish"
çık:çık VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "get out, exit"
de:de VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
duy:duy VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "hear"
evlen:evlen VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "marry"
gel:gel VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "come to a stop"
gez:gez VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "go around"
gezin:gezin VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "hang around"
git:gi%{t%} VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "go"
görün:görün VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "appear"
gül:gül VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "laugh"
kaç:kaç VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "escape"
